New Jersey, session 221, S4579.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  The overall estimated odds of winning a prize, regardless of amount, through a lottery game authorized pursuant to P.L.1970, c.13 (C.5:9-1 et seq.), other than draw based games, shall be prominently displayed on every lottery ticket or share sold. For draw based games, the estimated odds of winning shall be made readily available to consumers at the point of sale and on the official New Jersey Lottery website.  The estimated odds of winning shall be expressed in a standardized format in a manner to be determined by the commission. b.  The commission shall, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), promulgate rules and regulations as may be necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section. c.  For the purposes of this section, draw based game means a game whose tickets are generated from the gaming system, the winning numbers are randomly drawn by mechanical or electronic means, and does not have a pre-determined outcome. 2.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month following enactment, except that the commission may take anticipatory action in advance as necessary to implement the provisions of this act.